New Mexico, session 2026, SB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred twenty-two million dollars ($222,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of finance and administration for the New Mexico finance authority's water project fund for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for water projects authorized by the legislature in the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233447.1